Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-835
Boundary bridge; construction bonds authorized.

Any county, township, precinct, city or village in the State of Nebraska may issue bonds to construct or to aid in the construction of a highway bridge across any boundary river of the state.

Laws 1895, c. 45, § 1, p. 187;

R.S.1913, § 2996;

C.S.1922, § 2748;

C.S.1929, § 39-834;

R.S.1943, § 39-835.

County may issue bonds to construct or aid in the construction of a highway wagon bridge across a boundary stream. Ahern v. Richardson County, 127 Neb. 659, 256 N.W. 515 (1934).